test/src/morphology/N-vwrgw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - võrgõ: # Noun 115 'eng /est võrk/fin' - full paradigm
     võrgõ+N+Sg+Nom: võrgõ
     võrgõ+N+Sg+Gen: võrgõ
     võrgõ+N+Sg+Par: vȭrta
     võrgõ+N+Sg+Dat: võrgõn
     võrgõ+N+Sg+Ins: võrgõks
     võrgõ+N+Sg+Ill: [võrgõ, võrgõz]
     võrgõ+N+Sg+Ela: võrgõst
     võrgõ+N+Pl+Nom: võrgõd
     võrgõ+N+Pl+Gen: võrgõd
     võrgõ+N+Pl+Par: võrgidi
     võrgõ+N+Pl+Dat: võrgõdõn
     võrgõ+N+Pl+Ins: võrgõdõks
     võrgõ+N+Pl+Ill: võrgiž
     võrgõ+N+Pl+Ela: võrgist
